Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.105

Revenue bonds, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness for energy or water conservation programs.

A city or town engaged in the sale or distribution of water or energy may issue revenue bonds, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness in the manner provided by this chapter for the purpose of defraying the cost of financing programs for the conservation or more efficient use of energy or water. The bonds, warrants, or other evidences of indebtedness shall be deemed to be for capital purposes within the meaning of the uniform system of accounts for municipal corporations.

[ 1992 c 25 s 1; 1981 c 273 s 1.]

NOTES:

Uniform system of accounts for local governments: RCW 43.09.200.